Massachusetts, session 194th, H3740.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24 of chapter 90 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2010
official edition is hereby amended by adding the following section; section XX, nothing shall
prevent or prohibit the Registrar in the Commonwealth from allowing equal opportunity for an
individual to request a hearing for a hardship license for the operation of motorcycles in
accordance with sections 4 paragraph (C)(1) through (C)(3 3/4) of said section 24.
SECTION 2. Section 24 ½ of chapter 90 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2010
official edition by adding the following section; Section XX, for the purpose of section 24 ½, a
motorcycle shall be considered a ‘vehicle’ and nothing shall prevent or prohibit the Registrar
from allowing the installation of certified ignition interlocking devices on such motorcycles in
accordance with said section.
of 1